Florida, session 2026, SB194.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSection 683.338, Florida Statutes, is created to 43 read: 44 683.338âCharlie Kirk Day of Remembrance.â 45 (1)âOctober 14 of each year is designated as âCharlie Kirk 46 Day of Remembrance.â 47 (2)âThe Governor may annually issue a proclamation 48 designating October 14 as âCharlie Kirk Day of Remembrance.â 49 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.